Vermont statutes. Title 29 Public Property and Supplies
Subchapter 2. Capitol Complex; Parking

§ 191.
Parking.

Any State-owned or -leased parking lot in the Capitol Complex, as defined in

29 V.S.A. § 182(1)

, or any State-owned or -leased area used for parking outside the Capitol Complex but within the Montpelier area, shall be considered a “public highway,” as defined in

23 V.S.A. § 4(13)

, for enforcement purposes, whether or not open to the public or general circulation of vehicles. The driver or owner of any motor vehicle in such a State parking lot shall obey the instructions of any applicable posted sign or marking.

On land or in structures owned or leased by the State, including State parking lots described in subsection (a) of this section, an enforcement officer is authorized:

to enforce signs and markings relating to parking, stopping, standing, and operation of motor vehicles in a State parking lot;

to issue a Vermont traffic summons and complaint, pursuant to 23 V.S.A. chapter 24, to the driver or owner of a motor vehicle stopped, parked, standing, or being operated contrary to the instructions on an applicable posted sign or marking; or

pursuant to

23 V.S.A. § 1102

, at the driver’s or the owner’s expense, to move, remove, or immobilize, or cause to be moved, removed, or immobilized, any motor vehicle that is stopped, parked, standing, or being operated contrary to applicable posted signs and markings.

Any sign or marking shall be presumed to have been placed at the direction of the Sergeant at Arms or the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services, unless the contrary is established by competent evidence.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 47, eff. May 24, 2000; amended

2001, No. 61

, § 34, eff. June 16, 2001;

2019, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 11(a).